Washington statutes.
RCW 18.210.020

Unprofessional conduct.

In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, and conditions constitute unprofessional conduct:

(1) Practicing with a *practice permit or license issued under this chapter that is expired, suspended, or revoked;

(2) Being willfully untruthful or deceptive in any document, report, statement, testimony, or plan that pertains to the design or construction of an on-site wastewater treatment system;

(3) Submission of a design or as-built record to a local health jurisdiction, to the department of health, or to the department of ecology, that is knowingly based upon false, incorrect, misleading, or fabricated information; and

(4) Submission of any application for licensure or certification that contains false, fraudulent, or misleading information.

[ 2011 c 256 s 2; 2002 c 86 s 256; 1999 c 263 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The definition of "practice permit" was deleted pursuant to 2011 c 256 s 1.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.